Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska13-2004
Agency, defined.

Agency shall mean any combination of two or more municipalities or counties acting together under the Interlocal Cooperation Act or the Joint Public Agency Act, a natural resources district acting alone or together with one or more counties and municipalities under either of such acts, any joint entity as defined in section 13-803, or any joint public agency as defined in section 13-2503.

Laws 1992, LB 1257, § 4;

Laws 1999, LB 87, § 56.

Interlocal Cooperation Act, see section 13-801.

Joint Public Agency Act, see section 13-2501.